Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 1 General Provisions
18-4-14.
Recovery of reasonable expenses; recovery of actual expenses; refunds.

The garnishee shall be entitled to the garnishee’s actual reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, in preparing and filing a garnishee’s answer. The amount of expenses incurred shall be taxed in the bill of costs and shall be paid by the party upon whom the cost is cast, as costs are cast in other cases. The garnishee may deduct $50.00 or 10 percent of the amount paid into court, whichever is greater, not to exceed $100.00, as reasonable attorney’s fees or expenses.

If the garnishee can show that the garnishee’s actual attorney’s fees or expenses exceed the amount provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, the garnishee shall petition the court for a hearing at the time of filing the garnishee’s answer without deducting from the amount paid into court. Upon hearing from the parties, the court may enter an order for payment of actual attorney’s fees or expenses proven by the garnishee to have been incurred reasonably in preparing and filing the garnishee’s answer.

In the event the garnishee makes the deduction permitted in subsection (a) of this Code section but the costs are later cast upon the garnishee, the garnishee shall forthwith refund to the defendant the funds deducted; if the costs are later cast against the plaintiff, the court shall enter judgment in favor of the defendant and against the plaintiff for the amount of the deductions made by the garnishee.

Nothing in this Code section shall limit the reimbursement of costs incurred by a financial institution as provided in Code Section 7-1-237, nor interfere with, exclude, or supplant any contractual arrangement for a garnishee to reimburse itself for costs or fees of legal processing due to a garnishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 11/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “, nor interfere with, exclude, or supplant any contractual arrangement for a garnishee to reimburse itself for costs or fees of legal processing due to a garnishment” at the end of subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article discussing an advisory opinion issued by the Standing Committee on the Unlicensed Practice of Law on the issue of execution and filing of an answer in the garnishment action by a nonattorney employee of the garnishee, see 16 (No. 1) Ga. St. B.J. 102 (2010).

18-4-15.
Parties to garnishment; basis for exemption; form; challenge to garnishment.

A garnishment proceeding is an action between the plaintiff and garnishee; provided, however, that at any time before a judgment is entered, an order to disburse funds is issued, or money or other property subject to garnishment is distributed by the court, whichever occurs first, the defendant may become a party to the garnishment by filing a claim with the clerk of court and may use the form set forth in Code Section 18-4-82. A defendant’s claim shall assert the basis upon which he or she claims that his or her money or other property is exempt from garnishment. Money or other property may be exempt from garnishment for a variety of reasons, including, but not limited to, the limitations on garnishment as provided in Code Sections 18-4-5 and 18-4-53, exemptions as provided in Code Section 18-4-6, the plaintiff not having a judgment against the defendant, the amount claimed due by the plaintiff being erroneous, such money or other property being subject to a claim held by a third party that is superior to the judgment described in the affidavit of garnishment, or other legal or statutory defenses. Even when earnings are held at a financial institution, such money may be exempt from garnishment due to the limitations on garnishment as provided in Code Sections 18-4-5 and 18-4-53, exemptions as provided in Code Section 18-4-6, or other reasons.

The defendant shall serve a copy of his or her claim upon the plaintiff and garnishee. The clerk of court shall transmit a copy of the defendant’s claim to the plaintiff and garnishee. If the defendant’s claim alleges that money or other property in the possession of the court may be subject to a claim held by a third party that is superior to the judgment described in the affidavit of garnishment, the defendant shall serve a copy of his or her claim upon the third party named in such claim.

The defendant shall become a party to all proceedings by filing a claim pursuant to this Code section.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this Code section, upon the filing of the defendant’s claim, a judge of the court in which the garnishment is pending shall order a hearing to be held not more than ten days from the date the claim is filed. The form for the order for such hearing is set forth in Code Section 18-4-83. Such hearing shall be available to the defendant as a matter of right after filing his or her claim, and no further summons of garnishment shall issue nor shall any money or other property paid or delivered to the court as subject to garnishment be disbursed until the hearing shall be held.

The validity of the judgment upon which a garnishment is based shall only be challenged in accordance with Chapter 11 of Title 9, and no such challenge shall be entertained in the garnishment case. However, when the court finds that the defendant has attacked the validity of the judgment upon which the garnishment is based in an appropriate forum, the judge may order the garnishment be stayed until the validity of the judgment has been determined in such forum.

The filing of a claim by the defendant shall not relieve the garnishee of the duties of filing a garnishee answer, of withholding money or other property subject to garnishment, or of paying or delivering to the court any money or other property subject to garnishment.

A party’s failure to include the civil action file number on a defendant’s claim shall not affect the validity of such claim.

A court may decline to order a hearing upon, and may issue a denial of, any defendant’s claim which is filed after the dismissal of a garnishment action against such defendant. Except in a continuing garnishment or continuing garnishment for support, a court may decline to order a hearing upon, and may issue a denial of, any claim filed by a defendant which comes after a judgment is entered, an order to disburse funds is issued, or money or other property subject to garnishment is distributed by the court. No claim may succeed upon any basis which was already raised and adjudicated, or which was capable of being raised and adjudicated, in any claim previously made in the same garnishment action by the same defendant.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 12/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subsection (a), inserted “, an order to disburse funds is issued,”, deleted “before” preceding “money”, and substituted “distributed by the court, whichever occurs first” for “distributed,”; substituted “Except as provided in subsection (h) of this Code section, upon” for “Upon” at the beginning of subsection (d); and added subsection (h).

Cross references.

Garnishment not available against receiver,
§

9-8-12

.

Law reviews.

For note discussing property and persons subject to garnishment, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

18-4-16.
Plaintiff filing traverse.

Within 20 days after the plaintiff has been served with the garnishee’s answer, the plaintiff may file a traverse stating that the garnishee’s answer is untrue or legally insufficient. Such statement places in issue all questions of law and fact concerning the garnishee’s answer. The form for a plaintiff’s traverse is set forth in Code Section 18-4-87.

The plaintiff may also file a traverse within 30 days after the plaintiff has been served with a garnishee’s motion to modify default judgment pursuant to Code Section 18-4-24 or 18-4-43, stating that the motion is untrue or legally insufficient, and by doing so bears the burden of proving that the motion to modify default was not timely, that the costs to accompany such motion were not paid or were paid in an incorrect amount, or that the total of money or property identified in and paid with garnishee’s motion to modify as belonging or being owed to the defendant was not correct. The timeliness of the motion to modify, the payment of costs to accompany such motion, and the amount due from garnishee as belonging or being owed to the defendant during the applicable period are the only issues for trial on a traverse pursuant to this subsection. If a garnishee’s motion to modify is found to be true and legally sufficient but for payment of costs in an incorrect amount, the court shall allow the garnishee to pay the remaining unpaid cost amount within a time not less than 30 days, shall consider the motion modified accordingly, and upon such payment shall grant the modification sought in said motion.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 13/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

18-4-17.
Third-party claimants.

At any time before judgment is entered on the garnishee’s answer or money or other property subject to garnishment is distributed, any person may file a third-party claim in writing under oath stating that he or she has a claim superior to that of the plaintiff to the money or other property in the hands of the garnishee subject to the process of garnishment, and the third-party claimant shall be a party to all further proceedings upon the garnishment. A third-party claimant shall serve his or her claim upon the plaintiff, defendant, and garnishee. The form for a third-party claim is set forth in Code Section 18-4-88.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-18.
Priority of conflicting claims to money or property.

When money or other property in court is subject to a third-party claim or to more than one garnishment case, the party with the oldest entered judgment shall have priority to such money or other property and any interested party to any one of the garnishment cases may make a motion to the court where such money or other property has been deposited for the distribution of such money or other property. Each party of interest in each case and the clerk of court shall be served with a copy of the motion. Upon hearing the motion, the court shall enter an order directing that the clerk be paid the court cost of each garnishment proceeding first, and all remaining money or other property shall be distributed in accordance with the laws governing the relative priority of claims, judgments, and liens.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-19.
Order of trial; introduction of evidence; expenses.

After the garnishee’s answer is filed, the defendant’s claim shall be tried first, the plaintiff’s traverse shall be tried second, and third-party claims shall be tried last; provided, however, that the court shall retain the money or other property subject to garnishment until the completion of the trial of all claims and traverses which are filed under this chapter. The court may consolidate or bifurcate such actions for trial in the court’s discretion.

If a claim or traverse has been filed, all parties of record may introduce evidence to establish their respective interests in the money or other property in court, and the court shall direct that such money or other property be distributed in accordance with the laws governing the relative priority of claims, judgments, and liens.

When the defendant, garnishee, or third-party claimant prevails upon the trial of his or her claim:

That the plaintiff does not have a judgment against the defendant or that the plaintiff’s affidavit of garnishment is untrue or is legally insufficient, the garnishment case shall be dismissed by the court, and any money or other property belonging to the defendant in the possession of the court shall be restored to the defendant unless another claim or traverse thereto has been filed;

That the amount shown to be due on the plaintiff’s affidavit of garnishment is incorrect, the court shall allow the summons of garnishment to be amended to the amount proven to be owed, and if such amount is less than the amount shown to be due by the plaintiff, any money or other property belonging to the defendant in the possession of the court in excess of the amount due shall be restored to the defendant unless another claim or traverse thereto has been filed;

That the money or other property belonging to the defendant in the possession of the court is exempt from garnishment, such exempt money or other property shall be restored directly to the defendant. The court shall order such restoration within 48 hours; and

Based on any legal or statutory defense or that money or other property in the possession of the court may be subject to a claim held by a third party that is superior to the judgment described in the affidavit of garnishment, the court shall determine the disposition of the money or other property belonging to the defendant in the possession of the court.

On the trial of the plaintiff’s traverse, if the court finds:

The garnishee has failed to respond properly to the summons of garnishment, the court shall disallow any expenses demanded by the garnishee and shall enter a judgment for any money or other property the court finds subject to garnishment which the garnishee has failed to pay or deliver to the court or to the plaintiff; provided, however, that the total amount of such judgment shall not exceed the amount shown to be due by the plaintiff, together with the costs of the garnishment proceeding; or

The plaintiff’s traverse lacked reasonable justification, the court shall award the garnishee a judgment against the plaintiff for its attorney’s fees incurred in connection with the traverse.

A defendant shall not be allowed to present evidence, make an argument, or prevail on a claim that money or other property in a garnishment may be subject to a claim by a third party. When a claim of exemption or defense to a garnishment proceeding belongs to a defendant, a third-party claimant shall not be allowed to present evidence, make an argument, or prevail on any such claim.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2018, p. 820, § 6/SB 194; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 15/SB 443.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, inserted “, garnishee, or third-party claimant” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (c); deleted “paid or delivered to the court with the garnishee’s answer, plus any money or other property” following “money or other property” in the middle of subsection (d); and added subsection (e).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “shall” for “may” in paragraph (c)(2); substituted a colon for “the” in subsection (d); added the paragraph (d)(1) designation; in paragraph (d)(1), added “The” at the beginning, inserted “or to the plaintiff”, and substituted “; or” for a period; and added paragraph (d)(2).

18-4-20.
Failure to file claim or traverse in timely manner.

When no claim has been filed and no traverse has been filed within 20 days after the garnishee’s answer is filed:

If money is paid or delivered to the court by the garnishee, the clerk of the court shall pay the money to the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney upon application, and the garnishee shall be automatically discharged from further liability with respect to the summons of garnishment so answered;

If property is delivered to the court by the garnishee, the sheriff, marshal, constable, or like officer of the court shall sell the property in the manner provided by law for the sale of property levied under an execution, and the garnishee shall be automatically discharged from further liability with respect to the summons of garnishment so answered. The proceeds of such sale shall be paid or delivered to the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney upon application; or

If money or other property admitted to be subject to the garnishment is not paid or delivered to the court, judgment shall be entered for the plaintiff and against the garnishee for such money or other property and execution shall issue on the judgment.

The application described under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section may be made at any time concurrent with, or following the filing of the garnishment action, and need only be made once in any such action regardless of the number of answers filed.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 16/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

18-4-21.
Failure of garnishee to file answer; default.

Except as provided in Code Section 18-4-22, when a garnishee fails or refuses to file a garnishee answer by the forty-fifth day after service of the summons of garnishment, such garnishee shall automatically be in default. The default may be opened as a matter of right by the filing of a garnishee answer within 15 days of the day of default and payment of costs. If the case is still in default after the expiration of the period of 15 days, judgment by default may be entered at any time thereafter against such garnishee for the amount remaining due on the judgment obtained against the defendant as shown in the plaintiff’s affidavit of garnishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

Law reviews.

For note discussing default by the garnishee, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

18-4-22.
Financial institution as garnishee; failure to answer.

When a garnishee is a financial institution and fails or refuses to file a garnishee answer by the fifteenth day after the date of service of the summons of garnishment, such garnishee shall automatically be in default. The default may be opened as a matter of right by the filing of a garnishee answer within 15 days of the day of default and payment of costs. If the case is still in default after the expiration of the period of 15 days, judgment by default may be entered at any time thereafter against such garnishee for the amount remaining due on the judgment obtained against the defendant as shown in the plaintiff’s affidavit of garnishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

Law reviews.

For note discussing default by the garnishee, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

18-4-23.
Grounds for relief from liability.

A garnishee may be relieved from liability for failure to file a garnishee answer if the plaintiff failed to provide the information required by paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 18-4-7 that would reasonably enable the garnishee to respond properly to the summons of garnishment and a good faith effort to locate the requested property was made by the garnishee based on the information provided by the plaintiff. In determining whether a garnishee may be relieved of liability, the court shall consider any information or circumstances, including but not limited to the accuracy and quantity of the information supplied by the plaintiff pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 18-4-7, the manner in which such garnishee maintains and locates its records, the compliance by such garnishee with its own procedures, and the conformity of the record systems and procedures with reasonable commercial standards prevailing in the area in which such garnishee is located.

A garnishee shall not be subject to liability to any party or nonparty to the garnishment at issue arising from the attachment of a lien or the freezing, payment, or delivery into court of money or other property reasonably believed to be that of the defendant if such attachment, freezing, payment, or delivery is reasonably required by a good faith effort to comply with the summons of garnishment or with a modification of continuing garnishment by use of the form in Code Section 18-4-90. In determining whether such compliance by a garnishee is reasonable, the court shall consider any information or circumstances, including but not limited to the accuracy and quantity of the information supplied by the plaintiff pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 18-4-7, the manner in which such garnishee maintains and locates its records, the compliance by such garnishee with its own procedures, and the conformity of the record systems and procedures with reasonable commercial standards prevailing in the area in which such garnishee is located.

A plaintiff shall not be subject to liability to any party or nonparty to the garnishment at issue arising from the attachment of a lien or the freezing, payment, or delivery into court of money or other property by a garnishee where the plaintiff’s summons of garnishment and any attachments thereto include identifying information reasonably believed to be that of the defendant or defendants in the judgment upon which the garnishment is based.

A garnishee shall not be liable to any party or nonparty to the garnishment at issue arising from the attachment of a lien or the freezing, payment, or delivery into court of money or other property where such liability is based on any allegation disputing, or subsequent determination denying, the validity of such garnishment as described in subsection (d) of Code Section 18-4-7.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Association account” means any account or safe-deposit box or similar property maintained by a corporation, statutory close corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, foundation, trust, national, state, or local government or quasi-government entity, or other incorporated or unincorporated association.

“Fiduciary account” means any account or safe-deposit box maintained by any party in a fiduciary capacity for any other party other than the defendant in garnishment. Without limiting the foregoing, such term shall include any trust account as defined in Code Section 7-1-810, any account created pursuant to a transfer governed by Code Section 44-5-119, and any agency account or safe-deposit box governed by a power of attorney or other written designation of authority.

A garnishee shall not be liable for failure to pay or deliver to the court money or other property in an association account that may be subject to garnishment by reason of the fact that a defendant is an authorized signer on such association account, unless the summons of garnishment alleges that the association account is being used by the defendant for an improper or unlawful purpose.

A garnishee shall not be liable for failure to pay or deliver to the court money or other property in a fiduciary account that may be subject to garnishment if such fiduciary account specifically is exempted from garnishment as set forth in Code Section 18-4-6.

A garnishee shall not be liable for failure to pay or deliver to the court money or other property in a fiduciary account that may be subject to garnishment by reason of the fact that a defendant is a fiduciary of the fiduciary account, unless the summons of garnishment is against the defendant in the defendant’s capacity as a fiduciary of the fiduciary account or the summons of garnishment alleges that the fiduciary account is being used by the defendant for an improper or unlawful purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 17/SB 443; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 18/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsections (a) and (b), substituted “Code Section 18-4-7,” for “Code Section 18-4-7 with”; substituted
“any information or circumstances, including but not limited to”
for “and compare the” in the second sentence of subsection (a); in subsection (b), deleted “and a plaintiff” preceding “shall not”,
added “or with a modification of continuing garnishment by use of the form in Code Section 18-4-90”,
and substituted “any information or circumstances, including but not limited to” for “and compare”; added subsections (c) and (d); and redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (e).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 21, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “limited to the accuracy” for “limited to accuracy” in the middle of the second sentence of subsection (a).

18-4-24.
Modification of default judgments; burden of proof.

When a default judgment is rendered against a garnishee under Code Section 18-4-21, 18-4-22, or 18-4-43, the plaintiff shall serve the garnishee, as provided in Code Section 9-11-4, or, when the garnishment is filed in a magistrate court, the plaintiff may serve the garnishee by using the constable of the magistrate court in the manner set forth in Code Section 9-11-4, with a copy of such default judgment. On a motion filed not later than 90 days from the date the garnishee was served with such default judgment, the garnishee may, upon payment of any costs paid by the plaintiff to the clerk of court for the initiation of the action, and service on the garnishee, have such default judgment modified so that the amount of such default judgment shall be reduced to an amount equal to $50.00 plus 100 percent of the amount by which the garnishee was indebted to the defendant, including all money or other property belonging to the defendant which came into the garnishee’s hands:

For garnishments pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter, from the time of service of the summons of garnishment through and including the last day of the applicable garnishment period, less any exemption allowed the defendant and any funds paid by the garnishee into the court or to the plaintiff during the time for which an answer was due and not filed; or

For garnishments pursuant to Articles 2 and 3 of this chapter, from the time of service of the summons of garnishment or from the last timely answer, whichever is later, through and including the last day on which a timely garnishee answer could have been filed, less any exemption allowed the defendant and any funds paid by the garnishee into the court or to the plaintiff during the time for which an answer was due and not filed.

On the trial of a motion to modify a default judgment, the burden of proof shall be upon any plaintiff who objects to the timeliness of the motion to establish that such motion was not filed within the time provided for by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 18/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “When a default judgment is rendered against a garnishee under Code Section 18-4-21, 18-4-22, or 18-4-43, the plaintiff shall serve the garnishee, as provided in Code Section 9-11-4, or, when the garnishment is filed in a magistrate court, the plaintiff may serve the garnishee by using the constable of the magistrate court in the manner set forth in Code Section 9-11-4, with a copy of such default judgment. On a motion filed not later than 90 days from the date the garnishee was served with such default judgment, the garnishee may, upon payment of all accrued costs of court, have such default judgment modified so that the amount of such default judgment shall be reduced to an amount equal to the greater of $50.00 or $50.00 plus 100 percent of the amount by which the garnishee was indebted to the defendant from the time of service of the summons of garnishment through and including the last day on which a timely garnishee answer could have been made for all money or other property belonging to the defendant which came into the garnishee’s hands from the time of service of the summons through and including the last day on which a timely answer could have been made and less any exemption allowed the defendant.”

Law reviews.

For note discussing default by the garnishee, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

For note reviewing Georgia’s garnishment procedures, see 17 Ga. St. B.J. 140 (1981).

18-4-25.
Release of summons of garnishment; release of garnishment.

A release of a summons of garnishment:

Shall relieve the garnishee from any obligation to file a garnishee answer to any summons of garnishment pending on the date of the release and shall authorize the garnishee to pay or deliver to the defendant any money or other property in the garnishee’s possession belonging to the defendant; and

Shall not operate as a dismissal of the garnishment proceeding.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which garnishment proceedings are pending to issue a release of garnishment if:

The plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney requests a release in writing;

The amount shown to be due on the plaintiff’s affidavit of garnishment together with the costs of the garnishment proceeding are paid into court;

A judge enters an order, after a hearing required by this chapter, directing that the garnishment be released; or

The garnishment is dismissed.

The form for a release of garnishment is set forth in Code Section 18-4-89.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

18-4-26.
Local government organization and employees subject to garnishment; procedure.

Money due officials or employees of a municipal corporation or county of this state or of the state government, or any department or institution thereof, as salary for services performed for or on behalf of the municipal corporation or county of this state or the state, or any department or institution thereof, shall be subject to garnishment, except that in no event shall the officials’ or employees’ salary for services performed for or on behalf of any municipal corporation or county of this state or the state, or any department or institution thereof, be garnisheed when the judgment serving as a basis for the issuance of the summons of garnishment arises out of the liability incurred in the scope of the officials’ or employees’ governmental employment while responding to an emergency. In such cases, the summons of garnishment shall be directed to such political entity and served upon the person authorized by law to draw the warrant on the treasury of the government or to issue a check for such salary due, or upon the chief administrative officer of the political subdivision, department, agency, or instrumentality; and such entity shall be required to respond to such summons in accordance with the mandate thereof and as provided by this chapter.

For purposes of this Code section only, the state and its political subdivisions, departments, agencies, and instrumentalities shall be deemed private persons; and jurisdiction for the purpose of issuing a summons of garnishment shall be restricted to a court located in the county in which the warrant is drawn on the treasury of the government or in which the check is issued for the salary due the official or employee of the state or its political subdivisions, departments, agencies, or instrumentalities.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.